South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S81.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 44-7-262(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 44-7-262.  (A)(1) The department is authorized to reorganize or promulgate regulations that provide separate requirements for memory care facilities and assisted living facilities in nursing homes. The regulations shall require a sufficient number of staff to provide appropriate nursing care and related services to each resident of a nursing home at all times. (2) As a condition of licensure, in addition to the number of licensed nursing personnel required by R61-17, or any other regulation, a nursing home must provide at a minimum these resident-staff ratios for staff who provide nursing care: (1)(a) 9 to 1 for shift 1; (2)(b) 13 to 1 for shift 2; (3)(c) 22 to 1 for shift 3. (3) In those facilities utilizing two twelve-hour shifts, the staffing ratios for shift one apply to the twelve-hour shift occurring primarily during the day, and the staffing ratios for shift three apply to the twelve-hour shift occurring primarily during the night. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----